Illinois, session 104th, HB4337.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 534-21.11 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-21.11 new)7    Sec. 34-21.11. Electronic communication between district 8employees and students. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "District employee or volunteer" means a school 11administrator, classified or licensed employee of the 12district, school volunteer, nonfaculty coach or assistant 13coach, student teacher, or sponsor of an extracurricular 14program or activity.15    "Family member" means a parent, brother, sister, son, 16daughter, aunt, uncle, or grandparent.17    "Parent" means a parent, legal guardian, or other person 18or agency responsible for a student.19    "Traceable communication system" means one or more 20electronic school notification and communication programs or 21applications that:22        (1) are designated by the board;23        (2) trace all communications sent to or by a student;   HB4337- 2 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1    and2        (3) provide parents an opportunity to access and 3    review those communications.4    "Unauthorized electronic communication" means an 5electronic communication with a student by a district employee 6or volunteer who is not the student's family member that 7occurs outside of a designated traceable communication system 8and without prior written parental consent and includes any 9personal email account, text messaging, social media, or other 10electronic notification and communication programs outside of 11the traceable communication system.12    (b) The board shall designate a traceable communication 13system to be the exclusive means for a district employee or 14volunteer to communicate electronically with students. The 15principal of each public school shall provide parents written 16or electronic notification within the first 10 days of the 17school year of each electronic school notification and 18communication program designated within the traceable 19communication system. The notification shall include 20instructions for parents to access and review communications 21sent through each electronic school notification and 22communication program.23    Every district employee or volunteer shall sign an 24acknowledgment of the board's policy regarding the traceable 25communication system designated under this subsection.26    (c) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), a   HB4337- 3 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1district employee or volunteer may not communicate 2electronically with a student:3        (1) outside of the traceable communication system 4    designated by the board; or5        (2) through an unauthorized electronic communication 6    program or application.7    (d) A district employee who violates subsection (c) is 8subject to disciplinary action as follows:9        (1) For licensed employees, the district may note the 10    incident in their personnel file, issue a warning, or, if 11    appropriate, terminate employment or the State Board of 12    Education may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew 13    a license, impose probationary or supervisory conditions 14    upon a license, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, 15    or perform any combination of those actions regarding a 16    license.17        (2) For nonlicensed employees, the district may note 18    the incident in their personnel file, issue a warning, or, 19    if appropriate, terminate employment.20    A school volunteer who violates subsection (c) shall be 21prohibited from participating in future school volunteer 22opportunities.23    (e) A parent may submit written consent to authorize a 24designated district employee or volunteer who is not a family 25member to communicate electronically with his or her child 26outside of the traceable communication system. The written   HB4337- 4 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1consent:2        (1) shall be filed in the administrative office of the 3    student's school prior to any electronic communication 4    being sent from a district employee or volunteer to a 5    student outside of the traceable communication system;6        (2) shall designate a single, specific district 7    employee or volunteer, per each written consent, who may 8    communicate with the student outside of the traceable 9    communication system, which designation may not be 10    transferred to any other district employee or volunteer;11        (3) may be revoked by a parent at any time;12        (4) may establish terms limiting electronic 13    communication with a student, including a term requiring 14    that a parent be included as a direct party to all 15    electronic communications sent to the student outside of 16    the traceable communication system or establishing an 17    expiration for the term of the consent; and18        (5) may not authorize a district employee or volunteer 19    to engage in inappropriate or sexual electronic 20    communication with a student or be used as the basis of a 21    defense for a district employee or volunteer who engages 22    in inappropriate or sexual electronic communication.23Any electronic communication with a student outside of the 24traceable communication system shall comply with all terms of 25the written consent under paragraph (4). 26    (f) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), this Section   HB4337- 5 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1does not restrict any electronic communications between a 2student and his or her family member who is a district employee 3or volunteer.4    (g) A district employee or volunteer who receives a report 5alleging that another district employee or volunteer 6participated in an unauthorized electronic communication shall 7immediately notify the supervising principal. If the subject 8of the report is the principal, the district employee or 9volunteer shall immediately notify the general superintendent 10of schools. If the subject of the report is the general 11superintendent of schools, the district employee or volunteer 12shall immediately notify the State Superintendent of Education 13and the chairperson of the board.14    A district employee who violates this subsection is 15subject to disciplinary action as follows:16        (1) For licensed employees, the district may note the 17    incident in their personnel file, issue a warning, or, if 18    appropriate, terminate employment or the State Board of 19    Education may revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew 20    a license, impose probationary or supervisory conditions 21    upon a license, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, 22    or perform any combination of those actions regarding a 23    license.24        (2) For nonlicensed employees, the district may note 25    the incident in the personnel file, issue a warning, or, 26    if appropriate, terminate employment.  HB4337- 6 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1    (h) Upon receipt of a report alleging that a district 2employee or volunteer participated in an unauthorized 3electronic communication, the State Superintendent of 4Education, a principal, or the general superintendent of 5schools shall immediately:6        (1) notify the parent of each student who is an 7    alleged party to the unauthorized electronic 8    communication;9        (2) if the individual who is the subject of the report 10    is a licensed employee:11            (A) notify the State Board of Education, who shall 12        promptly investigate all allegations received under 13        this subsection and proceed with appropriate 14        disciplinary actions, including noting the incident in 15        the individual's personnel file, revoking, suspending, 16        or refusing to issue or renew a license, imposing 17        probationary or supervisory conditions upon a license, 18        issuing a written reprimand or admonishment, or 19        performing any combination of those actions regarding 20        a license; and21            (B) investigate the underlying allegations and 22        proceed with appropriate disciplinary actions, 23        including noting the incident in the individual's 24        personnel file, issuing a warning, or terminating 25        employment;26        (3) if the individual who is the subject of the report   HB4337- 7 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1    is a nonlicensed employee, investigate the underlying 2    allegations and proceed with appropriate disciplinary 3    actions, including noting the incident in the individual's 4    personnel file, issuing a warning, or terminating 5    employment; and6        (4) if the individual who is the subject of the report 7    is a school volunteer, investigate the underlying 8    allegations and, if substantiated, prohibit the volunteer 9    from participating in future school volunteer 10    opportunities.11    If a principal or the general superintendent of schools 12violates this subsection, he or she is subject to disciplinary 13action, including the revocation or suspension of or refusal 14to issue or renew a license, the imposition of probationary or 15supervisory conditions upon a license, the issuance of a 16written reprimand or admonishment, any combination of those 17actions regarding a license, or termination of employment.18    (i) The State Board of Education shall develop a complaint 19form for parents to submit to the board, the district, or the 20State Board of Education if a district employee or volunteer 21violates this Section. 22    If a complaint alleges an unauthorized electronic 23communication, sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the 24identity of a complainant who is not the general 25superintendent of schools and any identifying information of a 26minor involved in the complaint shall remain confidential.  HB4337- 8 -LRB104 17078 LNS 30495 b1    If a complaint alleges an unauthorized electronic 2communication, sexual contact, or other sexual misconduct, the 3board, the district, or the State Board of Education shall 4have 120 days after the complaint is filed to conduct an 5initial review.